Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.778

Existing contracts for fire protection services and equipment not abrogated.

Nothing in chapter 117, Laws of 1992, shall be interpreted to abrogate existing contracts for fire protection services and equipment, nor be deemed to authorize cities and towns to negotiate additional contractual provisions to apply prior to the expiration of such existing contracts. Upon expiration of contracts negotiated prior to March 31, 1992, future contracts between such cities and towns and state agencies and institutions shall be governed by the provisions of RCW 35.21.775 and 35.21.779.

[ 1992 c 117 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—1992 c 117: See note following RCW 35.21.775.